Mississippi, session 2026, HB1368.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Bills for any utility service shall be rendered within forty-five (45) days from the reading of the meter except as may be otherwise specifically authorized by the commission. SECTION 2.  Section 21-27-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 21-27-7. (1)  (a)  The governing authorities of municipalities shall have the power to erect, purchase, maintain and operate waterworks, and to regulate the same, and to prescribe the rates at which water shall be supplied to the users.  The rates at which water, wastewater, and sewer services shall be supplied shall be just and reasonable based on the actual cost to operate and maintain the systems, and rates may not be unreasonably preferential, prejudicial or discriminatory but shall be sufficient, equitable and consistent in application to each class of users.  While a municipality may set different rates for different classifications of users, a municipality shall not discriminate in setting rates among members of the same classification.  The municipal governing authorities shall make a finding on the minutes of the governing body establishing the rate based on the actual cost to operate and maintain the system.  A municipality shall not charge a user a fee for services received which is less than the cost incurred by the municipality to provide such services. (b) The governing authorities of a municipality shall establish and maintain rates and charges in equitable proportion to the use of the services and benefits rendered by the waterworks systems and water treatment facilities serving the municipal area.  From time to time the governing authorities shall adjust such rates, to the end that the revenues therefrom will be sufficient at all times to pay the expenses of operating and maintaining such works, facilities and systems and all of the municipality's obligations under any contract or bond resolution with respect thereto.  The calculation of a user's bill shall be limited to the actual amount of volumetric usage, plus those fees reasonable and necessary for the cost of capital expenses, system operation and maintenance, and debt service. (c) If a user's meter is tampered with, unreadable, or otherwise out-of-order, a municipality may render an estimated bill to that user for a period not to exceed six (6) months.  In such circumstance, an estimated bill shall be based upon the prior average measured usage of the user or a similar user of the same classification. (i) Only in the event a municipality is unable to meet the requirement of billing based solely on volumetric usage, such municipality may bill based on a flat fee rate where such municipality has established flat fee billing as its usual and customary billing practice prior to July 1, 2023, and where such municipality is actively billing based upon a flat fee rate as of July 1,2023. In such circumstances, flat fee billing may be utilized until such time as the municipality implements upgrades to its system to provide for volumetric billing.  In such circumstance, the municipality may set different flat fee rates for different classifications of users, but the municipality shall not discriminate in setting flat fee rates among members of the same classification, and the municipality shall not charge a user a fee for services received that is less than the cost incurred by the municipality to provide such services. (ii) The governing authorities of the municipality shall make a finding annually on the minutes of the governing body establishing the rate based upon the actual cost to operate and maintain the system as determined under Generally Accepted Accounting Principles, and the municipality shall not charge a user a fee for services received that is less than the cost incurred by the municipality, or based on the assessed value of the property, to provide such services. (d) Notice of any change in the rate or rate structure at which services are supplied shall be posted on all bills sent to users at least one (1) month prior to the effective date of the rate change.  Notice shall also be posted to the municipality's online web page or bill payment platform, if the municipality has an online web page or bill payment platform. (e) Nothing in this statute shall be construed as prohibiting a user or governing authority of any municipality from applying for and receiving any federally or privately subsidized payment assistance, grant or other funds. (f) The governing authority of a municipality may provide for the calculation of a user's bill by a method other than volumetric usage only in exchange for consideration as part of, or in connection with, an incentive contract or other form of benefit or assistance related to the user's location, expansion, or maintenance of its commercial or industrial operation within the municipality, so long as such rate is equitable, fair, and nondiscriminatory, and the municipality shall not charge such user a fee for services received that is less than the cost incurred by the municipality to provide such services. (2) The governing authorities of municipalities shall have the power to acquire by purchase, donation or condemnation, in the name of the municipality, suitable grounds, within or without the corporate limits, upon which to erect waterworks, and also the right-of-way to and from such works and the right-of-way for laying water pipes within the corporate limits, and from such waterworks to the municipality, and to extend such right-of-way from time to time.  The governing authorities shall have the power to contract with any person for the maintenance and operation of waterworks.  The authorities shall have the power to contract with any person for the erection and maintenance of waterworks for a term not exceeding twenty-five (25) years, fixing water rates in the contract subject to municipal regulations.  A contract for the erection or purchase of waterworks shall not, however, be entered into until submitted to a vote of the qualified electors and approved by a majority of those voting.  A contract for maintenance under which the person who will perform such maintenance is wholly or partially responsible for fixing water rates shall not be entered into until submitted to a vote of the qualified electors and approved by a majority of those voting.  It shall be unlawful for any municipally owned waterworks to supply water free of charge, or in any amount less than the fixed charges, to any person, firm or corporation, except as is expressly authorized by law. SECTION 3.  Section 21-27-23, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 21-27-23. Any municipality may: (a) Borrow money and issue revenue bonds therefor solely for the purposes specified in this section and by the procedure provided in Sections 21-27-41 through 21-27-69. Money may be borrowed and bonds issued by any municipality of the State of Mississippi, as defined in Section 21-27-11, to acquire or improve any waterworks system, water supply system, sewerage system, sewage disposal system, garbage disposal system, rubbish disposal system or incinerators, gas producing system, gas generating system, gas transmission system, or gas distribution system, electric generating, transmission or distribution system, railroad transportation system for passengers and freight, or motor vehicle transportation system, including any combination of any or all of those systems into one (1) system, within or without the corporate limits thereof, for the purpose of supplying the municipality and the persons and corporations, both public and private, whether within or without its corporate limits, with the services and facilities afforded by the system, provided that water, electric energy, or gas afforded by any system or systems may be supplied to such ultimate consumers thereof by sale thereof to the owners or operators of a distribution system for resale to the public.  Any municipality which shall borrow money and issue revenue bonds to provide funds with which to acquire a gas transmission system, if necessary in order to reach and obtain a source of supply of gas for the municipality, may extend or construct its gas transmission line into an adjoining state, and may use and expend part of the proceeds of such issue of revenue bonds for the purpose. (b) To assume all indebtedness for any system or systems which may be acquired under the provisions of this section as all or part of the consideration for the acquisition of such system or systems and to issue its revenue bonds in exchange for the bonds or notes evidencing the indebtedness. (c) To acquire or improve any system which it is authorized to borrow money and issue revenue bonds under subsection (a) of this section to acquire or improve; and to make contracts in furtherance thereof or in connection therewith. (d) To own, operate and maintain any such system or combination of any and all of said systems into one (1) system. (e) To establish, maintain and collect rates for the facilities and services offered by any such system; provided that if there is a combination of systems into one or more systems, the municipality establishing the same shall be and is empowered to establish, maintain and collect rates for any and all of the services or for any combination thereof, and the municipality may discontinue any or all of the services upon any failure to promptly pay the charges fixed for the services.  The rates so fixed for services rendered by any system or combination thereof may be charged for all services rendered thereby, regardless of whether the services may have been previously rendered without rates or charges therefor by the previously existing waterworks system, water supply system, sewerage system, sewage disposal system, garbage disposal system, rubbish disposal system or incinerators, gas producing system, gas generating system, gas transmission system, or gas distribution system, electric generating, transmission or distribution system, which shall have been merged into the combined system.  Any such municipality may pledge for the payment of any bonds issued to acquire or improve any such combined system, or to refund any bonds previously issued to acquire or improve any such combined system or to acquire or improve any system merged with such combined system, the revenues to be derived from the operation of such combined system, including the charges authorized to be imposed by this section. A municipality may authorize a municipally owned utility to make early payment of the utility's bills to its electricity suppliers which offer early payment discounts to the municipally owned utility.  The municipality may immediately refund to a customer of the municipally owned utility his or her deposit for municipal utility services after the municipal utility has determined that payment for all services and any other obligations which the customer may have incurred in regard to the municipal utility has been made. If the revenues of any previously existing system being merged into a combined system are subject to a prior lien, the revenues and the expenses of any previously existing system shall be accounted for separately to the extent necessary to satisfy the covenants relating to the prior lien for so long as the indebtedness secured by the revenues shall remain outstanding.  Only surplus revenues remaining after the satisfaction of all covenants relating to the outstanding indebtedness may be pledged to the retirement of any indebtedness to be secured by the revenues of a combined system.  The existence of the outstanding indebtedness shall not, in and of itself, prevent the combining of systems as herein provided, so long as the prior lien on the revenues of any previously existing system is fully satisfied from the revenues of the previously existing system. (f) To acquire property, real or personal, which may be necessary to effectuate the powers conferred by this section.  The municipality may purchase electric transmission line materials, electric distribution system substation equipment, transformer equipment, and all other appliances, apparatus, machinery, equipment and appurtenances necessary for the sale of electricity, such as utility vehicles and fencing, from the surplus inventory of the Tennessee Valley Authority or any other similar agency of the federal government and electric power associations.  These purchases by the municipality shall be exempt from the public bid requirements prescribed in Sections 31-7-12 and 31-7-13.  If the power of eminent domain is exercised, it shall be exercised in the manner provided by Sections 11-27-1 through 11-27-51. (g) To enter into contract with the United States of America or any agency thereof, under the provisions of acts of the Congress of the United States, to aid or encourage public works and the regulations made in pursuance thereof, for the sale of bonds issued in accordance with the provisions of Sections 21-27-41 through 21-27-69 or for the acceptance of a grant to aid such municipality in acquiring or improving any such system; and the contracts may contain terms and conditions as may be agreed upon by and between the municipality and the United States of America or any agency thereof, or any purchaser of the bonds. (h) To adopt the ordinances and resolutions and to do all things and perform all acts necessary, proper or desirable to effectuate the full intent and purpose of Sections 21-27-11 through 21-27-69, including processing, marketing, custom processing, sale and resale of materials processed through any facility under its jurisdiction. (i) To borrow from the Mississippi Development Bank in order to fund the advance purchase of energy for its gas producing, generating, transmission or distribution system or its electric generating, transmission or distribution system. (j) Enter into an interlocal agreement in accordance with Section 21-27-75. SECTION 4.  Section 21-27-47, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 21-27-47. Any municipality having outstanding bonds issued pursuant to the authority granted in Section 21-27-23 shall maintain rates for all the services and facilities afforded by any system, the revenues of which are pledged to the payment of such bonds, which rates shall be sufficient at all times to maintain an interest and bond redemption fund sufficient to pay the interest on and principal of such bonds as and when the same become due and payable and, if so provided in the ordinance authorizing such bonds, to accumulate a reserve in such fund, and to provide for the payment of such cost of operation and maintenance as may be necessary to keep such system at all times in good repair and working order. Such rates shall be fixed by separate ordinance precedent to or at the time of the issuance of such bonds and shall be revised from time to time so as to produce the amounts necessary to provide for the foregoing. Bonds issued pursuant to the authority granted in Section 21-27-23 to acquire or improve a system shall be secured by a pledge of an amount of the gross revenues of such system sufficient to maintain such an interest and bond redemption fund. However, if there are then outstanding bonds to the payment of which the revenues of a system have been previously pledged, then, until said outstanding bonds have been retired, bonds issued to improve such system shall be secured by a pledge of the revenues of the system in such an amount only after deductions have been made for servicing the said outstanding bonds and for maintaining and operating the system. Notwithstanding the above provisions, all revenue bonds issued for a specific utility may be issued on an equivalent basis, provided that each and every ordinance authorizing each and every bond issued shall clearly state the basis on which future revenue bond issues shall be provided for in order to place them on an equivalent basis with prior issues. SECTION 5.  Section 21-27-165, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 21-27-165. A municipality is authorized and empowered to acquire, construct, improve, enlarge, extend, repair, operate and maintain one or more sewage disposal systems and make contracts with any person or any public agency, under the terms of which the municipality will, within or without the municipality but within its metropolitan area, collect, transport, treat or dispose of waste for such person or public agency. A municipality may also enter into contracts with any person to purchase or sell, by installments over such term as may be deemed desirable, or otherwise, any waste collection, transportation, treatment or sewage disposal facilities or systems. A municipality is also authorized to enter into operating agreements with any person, for such terms and upon such conditions as may be deemed desirable, for the operation of any waste collection, transportation, treatment or sewage disposal facilities or systems of any person by the municipality; and a municipality may lease to or from any person, for such term and upon such conditions as may be deemed desirable, any waste collection, transportation, treatment or sewage disposal facilities or systems. SECTION 6.  Section 77-3-2, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 77-3-2. (1)  The Legislature finds and determines that the rates, services and operations of public utilities as defined in this title are affected with the public interest and that the availability of an adequate and reliable service by such public utilities to the people, economy and government of the State of Mississippi is a matter of public policy.  The Legislature hereby declares to be the policy of the State of Mississippi: (a) To provide fair regulation of public utilities in the interest of the public; (b) To promote the inherent advantage of regulated public utilities; (c) To promote adequate, reliable and economical service to all citizens and residents of the state; (d) To provide just and reasonable rates and charges for public utility services without unjust discrimination, undue preferences or advantages, or unfair or destructive competitive practices and consistent with long-term management and conservation of energy resources by avoiding wasteful, uneconomic and inefficient uses of energy; (e) To encourage and promote harmony between public utilities, their users and the environment; (f) To foster the continued service of public utilities on a well-planned and coordinated basis that is consistent with the level of service needed for the protection of public health and safety and for the promotion of the general welfare; (g) To cooperate with other states and the federal government in promoting and coordinating interstate and intrastate public utility service and reliability; (h) To encourage the continued study and research for new and innovative rate-making procedures which will protect the state, the public, the ratepayers and the utilities, and where possible reduce the costs of the rate-making process; and (i) With respect to rate-regulated public utilities, to foster, encourage, enable and facilitate economic development in the State of Mississippi, to support and augment economic development activities, to expand deployment of existing and emerging technologies, including fiber-optic infrastructure which will foster a more reliable and resilient utility delivery system and provide customer access to enhanced services, to authorize and empower the Public Service Commission in carrying out its statutory responsibilities, and to take every opportunity to advance the economic development of the state. (2) To these ends, therefore, authority shall be vested in the Mississippi Public Service Commission to regulate public utilities in accordance with the provisions of this title. (3) (a)  The commission shall, in addition to its other powers and duties, be authorized and empowered, in its discretion, to consider and adopt a formula type rate of return evaluation rate which may include provision for the commission to: (i) Periodically review and adjust, if required, the utility's level of revenues based upon the actual books and records of the utility which are periodically the subject of independent audits and regulatory audits; (ii) Review the utility's performance in certain areas or categories which may be used by the commission in the manner selected by it which may include rate incentives or penalties so long as such are found to be fair and reasonable and result in a level of revenue which is fair and reasonable; and (iii) Use such other provisions which may be permitted by this chapter. (b) When a formula type rate of return evaluation rate with periodic revenue adjustments is adopted by the commission, each periodic revenue adjustment will be separately considered for the purpose of determining whether a hearing is required pursuant to Section 77-3-39(1), and no such hearing shall be required if the amount of any separate periodic adjustment to the level of revenues of the utility is not a "major change" as defined in Section 77-3-37(8). (c) In administering any such formula type rate of return evaluation rate, the following procedures shall be observed by the commission: (i) Each periodic evaluation shall be supported with a sworn filing by the utility incorporating the data specified in the formula rate adopted by the commission, and such data shall be verified by the commission; and (ii) A hearing shall be required, as provided by law, to determine compliance with the formula rate plan and the accuracy of the data prior to any change in the level of revenues if the cumulative change in any calendar year exceeds the greater of Two Hundred Thousand Dollars ($200,000.00) or four percent (4%) of the annual revenues of the utility. (d) The requirements of paragraphs (a), (b) and (c) of this subsection and other applicable provisions of Title 77, Chapter 3, Article 1, Mississippi Code of 1972, which are observed by the commission in administering such rate, are hereby declared to be procedural but are not required to be included in the rate itself. (4) It is the intention of the Legislature to validate, retroactively to its initial adoption by the commission, any formula type rate, including any revenue adjustments effected pursuant thereto, which has heretofore been adopted by the commission.  For the purposes of the retroactive validation and the administration of any formula type rate heretofore adopted by the commission, should the provisions of Title 77, Chapter 3, Article 1, Mississippi Code of 1972, conflict with any provisions of such formula type rate, Title 77, Chapter 3, Article 1, Mississippi Code of 1972, shall be interpreted to prevail and the formula type rate shall hereafter be administered or revised to conform to Title 77, Chapter 3, Article 1, Mississippi Code of 1972; provided, however, such conflict, if any, shall not be held to invalidate the retroactive effect of this section upon such rate. SECTION 7.  Section 77-3-45, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 77-3-45. The commission shall prescribe, issue, amend and rescind such reasonable rules and regulations as may be reasonably necessary or appropriate to carry out the provisions of this chapter.  No rule or regulation shall be effective until thirty (30) days after a notice setting forth either the terms or substance thereof or a description of the subjects and issues involved and the time and place of a hearing thereon shall have been published in a newspaper of general circulation in the state.  The commission shall file the notice with the Secretary of State pursuant to the Mississippi Administrative Procedures Law and mail a copy of it to all affected public utilities.  The commission shall mail a copy of the proposed rule or regulation to any public utility that requests a copy.  The hearing may be held at any time twenty (20) days after date of publication of the notice, but the rules or regulations shall not become effective until a hearing thereon.  A proceeding to contest any rule or regulation due to noncompliance with the procedural requirements of this section must be commenced within one (1) year from the effective date of the rule or regulation.  All rules and regulations of the commission shall be filed with its executive secretary and shall be readily available for public inspection and examination during reasonable business hours.  Any interested person shall have the right to petition the commission for issuance, amendment or repeal of a rule or regulation. The commission shall, in the exercise of its power to promulgate rules and regulations, adopt standard practices and procedures: (a) To specify what costs may be used for determining a public utility's rate base, which balance the interests of consumers and investors; (b) To prescribe the time period for measuring a public utility's rate base; (c) To specify allowable operating expenses, provided, however, that the commission shall exclude from a public utility's allowable operating expenses any interest such utility paid, or credited, to its consumers in connection with refunds in a rate proceeding in which its rates were finally determined to be excessive; (d) To determine accurately the capital costs of a public utility; (e) To define specific costs which may be included by a public utility in its monthly fuel adjustment clause retail billings; (f) To define specific costs which may be included by a public utility distributing gas in its monthly purchased gas adjustments retail billings; (g) To prescribe minimal uniform standards of service for various classes of public utilities; and (h) To provide for any other rules and regulations deemed by the commission to be appropriate for carrying out the provisions of this chapter. SECTION 8.  Section 77-3-301, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 77-3-301. Any person, firm, copartnership or corporation doing business in the State of Mississippi and engaged in the sale or distribution of electricity, gas or water, whose rates or tariffs for such service contain any form of so-called "service charge," shall be required to have fair and reasonable optional rate schedules and minimum charges that do not contain any form of such so-called "service charge," so that the consumer may exercise his option as to the form of rate schedule under which said consumer will be billed for service used.  Such optional rate schedules shall not require the payment for each unit of electricity, gas, or water consumed, at a rate in excess of the rates per unit prescribed for use which were in effect prior to the establishment of a "service charge" by such person, firm or corporation affected hereby. SECTION 9.  Section 77-3-303, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 77-3-303. All bills rendered to consumers by any public service utility affected by this article shall be itemized so as to show in detail the amount of electricity, gas or water consumed and the rate per unit charged. SECTION 10.  Section 77-5-23, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 77-5-23. The authority shall have power: (a) To sue and be sued. (b) To have a seal and alter the same at pleasure. (c) To render service to the inhabitants of the state and, by contract or contracts with any person, federal agency or municipality or by its own employees, to acquire, own, operate, maintain and improve a system or systems. (d) To acquire, hold and dispose of property, real and personal, tangible and intangible, or interests therein, in its own name, subject to mortgages or other liens or otherwise and to pay therefor in cash or on credit, and to secure and procure payment of all or any part of the purchase price thereof on such terms and conditions as the board shall determine. (e) To cause surveys to be made of areas throughout the state for the purpose of determining the economic soundness of the acquisition of a system or systems therein, to make plans and estimates of the cost of such system or systems and in connection therewith to enter on any lands, waters and premises for the purpose of making such surveys, soundings and examinations. (f) To have complete control and supervision of the system or systems and to make such rules and regulations governing the rendering of service thereby as, in the judgment of the board, may be just and equitable. (g) To fix, maintain and collect rates and charges for service. (h) To use any right-of-way, easement or other similar property right necessary or convenient in connection with the acquisition, improvement, operation or maintenance of a system or systems, held by the state or any political subdivision thereof, provided, that the governing body of such political subdivision shall consent to such use. (i) To execute all instruments necessary or convenient including, but not limited to, indentures of trust, leases, and bonds. (j) To borrow money and issue bonds and to provide for the rights of the holders thereof. (k) To accept gifts or grants of money or property, real or personal, and voluntary and uncompensated services from any person, federal agency or municipality. (l) To condemn any land, easements, or rights-of-way, either on, under, or above the ground as the board may deem necessary for any of the purposes mentioned in this article, and such property or interest in such property may be so acquired whether or not the same is owned or held for public use by corporations, associations or persons having the power of eminent domain or otherwise held or used for public purposes.  Such power of condemnation may be exercised in the mode or method of procedure prescribed by Chapter 27, Title 11, of the Mississippi Code of 1972, or in the mode or method of procedure prescribed by any other applicable statutory provisions now in force or hereafter enacted for the exercise of the power of eminent domain.  Where condemnation proceedings become necessary the judge of the circuit court in which such proceedings are filed shall upon application of the authority and upon the deposit in the court, to the use of the person or persons lawfully entitled thereto, of such an amount as the judge may deem necessary to assure just compensation, order that the right of possession shall issue immediately or as soon and upon such terms as the judge, in his discretion, may deem proper and just.  Upon application of the parties in interest, the judge may order that the money deposited in the court, or any part thereof, be paid forthwith for or on account of the just compensation to be awarded in said proceedings. (m) To make any and all contracts necessary or convenient for the full exercise of the powers herein granted, including, but not limited to, contracts with any person, federal agency, or municipality (a) for the purchase or sale of energy, (b) for the management and conduct of the business of the authority or any part thereof, and (c) for the acquisition of all or part of any system or systems. In connection with any such contract the authority shall have the power to stipulate and agree to such covenants, terms and conditions as the board may deem appropriate, including, but without limitations, covenants, terms and conditions with respect to the resale rates, financial and accounting methods, services, operation and maintenance practices, and the manner of disposing of the revenues of the system or systems conducted and operated by the authority. (n) To do any and all acts and things herein authorized or necessary or convenient to carry out the powers expressly given in this article under, through or by means of its own officers, agents and employees, or by contracts with any person, federal agency or municipality. (o) To pledge all or any part of its revenues and to mortgage or otherwise incumber all or any part of its property for the purpose of securing the payment of the principal and interest on any of its bonds or other obligations. SECTION 11.  Section 77-5-35, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 77-5-35. The state does pledge to and agree with the holders of bonds issued by the authority that the state will not limit or alter the rights and powers vested in the authority to fix and collect such rates, fees and charges as may be necessary or advisable in order to produce sufficient revenue to meet all expenses of maintenance and operation of its system or systems and to fulfill the terms of any agreements made with the holders of such bonds, or in any way impair the rights and remedies of the holders of such bonds, until such bonds together with interest thereon, and interest on any unpaid installments of interest, and all costs and expenses in connection with any suits, actions or proceedings by or on behalf of such bondholders are fully paid and discharged. SECTION 12.  Section 77-5-155, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 77-5-155. Any district created pursuant to this article shall have the power: (a)  To sue and be sued (b)  To have a seal (c)  To acquire by purchase, gift, devise, lease or exercise of the power of eminent domain or other mode of acquisition and to hold and dispose of real and personal property of every kind within or without the district, subject to mortgages or any other liens. (d)  To make and enter into contracts, conveyances, mortgages, deeds of trust, bonds or leases. (e)  To incur debts, to borrow money, to issue negotiable bonds and other evidences of indebtedness and to provide for the rights of holders thereof. (f)  To fix, maintain and collect rates and charges for any service. (g)  To pledge all or any part of its revenues. (h)  To make such covenants in connection with the issuance of bonds, or to secure the payment of bonds, that a private business corporation can make under the general laws of the state, notwithstanding that such covenants may operate as limitations on the exercise of any power granted by this article. (i)  To use any right of way, easement or other similar property right necessary or convenient in connection with the acquisition, improvement, operation or maintenance of a utility, held by the state or any political subdivision thereof, provided that the governing body of such political subdivision shall consent to such use. SECTION 13.  Section 77-5-743, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 77-5-743. A municipality is hereby authorized to fix, charge and collect rents, rates, fees and charges for electric power and energy and other services, facilities and commodities sold, furnished or supplied through the facilities of its electric system or its interest in any joint project. For so long as any bonds of a municipality are outstanding and unpaid, the rents, fees and charges shall be so fixed as to provide revenues sufficient to pay all costs of and charges and expenses in connection with the proper operation and maintenance of its electric system, and its interest in any joint project, and all necessary repairs, replacements or renewals thereof, to pay when due the principal of, premium, if any, and interest on all bonds and other evidences of indebtedness payable from said revenues, to create and maintain reserves as may be required by any resolution authorizing and securing bonds, to pay when due the principal of, premium, if any, and interest on all bonds heretofore or hereafter issued to finance additions, improvements and betterments to its electric system, and to pay any and all amounts which the municipality may be obligated to pay from said revenues by law or contract. Nothing herein contained shall be construed to prohibit any municipality from expending any revenues in excess of that required herein in any manner otherwise permitted by law. SECTION 14.  Section 77-5-745, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 77-5-745. A joint agency is hereby authorized to fix, charge and collect rents, rates, fees and charges for electric power and energy and other services, facilities and commodities sold, furnished or supplied through the facilities of its projects. For so long as any bonds of a joint agency are outstanding and unpaid, the rents, rates, fees and charges shall be so fixed as to provide revenues sufficient to pay all costs of and charges and expenses in connection with the proper operation and maintenance of its projects, and all necessary repairs, replacements or renewals thereof, to pay when due the principal of, premium, if any, and interest on all bonds and other evidences of indebtedness payable from said revenues, to create and maintain reserves as may be required by any resolution authorizing and securing bonds, and to pay any and all amounts which the joint agency may be obligated to pay from said revenues by law or contract. SECTION 15.  Section 77-6-35, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 77-6-35. A municipality is hereby authorized to fix, charge and collect rents, rates, fees and charges for gas and other services, facilities and commodities sold, furnished or supplied through the facilities of its gas system or its interest in any joint project. For so long as any bonds of a municipality are outstanding and unpaid, the rents, fees and charges shall be so fixed as to provide revenues sufficient to pay all costs of and charges and expenses in connection with the proper operation and maintenance of its gas system, and its interest in any joint project, and all necessary repairs, replacements or renewals thereof, to pay when due the principal of, premium, if any, and interest on all bonds and other evidences of indebtedness payable from said revenues, to create and maintain reserves as may be required by any resolution authorizing and securing bonds, to pay when due the principal of, premium, if any, and interest on all bonds heretofore or hereafter issued to finance additions, improvements and betterments to its gas system, and to pay any and all amounts which the municipality may be obligated to pay from said revenues by law or contract. Nothing herein contained shall be construed to prohibit any municipality from expending any revenues in excess of that required herein in any manner otherwise permitted by law. SECTION 16.  Section 77-6-37, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 77-6-37. The authority is hereby authorized to fix, charge and collect rents, rates, fees and charges for gas and other services, facilities and commodities sold, furnished or supplied through the facilities of its projects. For so long as any bonds of the authority are outstanding and unpaid, the rents, rates, fees and charges shall be so fixed as to provide revenues sufficient to pay all costs of and charges and expenses in connection with the proper operation and maintenance of its projects and all necessary repairs, replacements or renewals thereof, to pay when due the principal of, premium, if any, and interest on all bonds and other evidences of indebtedness payable from said revenues, to create and maintain reserves as may be required by any resolution authorizing and securing bonds, and to pay any and all amounts which the authority may be obligated to pay from said revenues by law or contract. SECTION 17.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.